Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Board of Nursing

63-7-201. Creation.

There is created a board to be known as the board of nursing, composed of eleven (11) members, referred to in this chapter as “board,” appointed by the governor in the manner and for the terms of office as provided in § 63-7-202.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-730; Acts 1984, ch. 755, § 3; 2005, ch. 387, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health.

The board of nursing, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Duties of nurses regarding known or suspected child sexual abuse, §§ 37-1-403, 37-1-605.

Persons regulated by board: exemption from certification requirements for professional counselors and marital and family therapists, § 63-22-113.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-7-202. Composition — Candidates — Qualifications — Vacancies.

The governor shall appoint eleven (11) members to the board, as follows:

Nine (9) members, one (1) from each congressional district, who are either an advanced practice registered nurse or a registered nurse at the time of their appointment. At least two (2) members shall be registered nurses. At least three (3) members shall be advanced practice registered nurses. For the purposes of this section, an advanced practice registered nurse shall not include registered nurses;

One (1) member who is a licensed practical nurse at the time of such nurse's appointment; and

One (1) consumer member.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall consider appointing members who work in a variety of healthcare positions, including the following practice settings:

A Level I trauma center licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 2;

An acute care hospital;

A critical access hospital or a rural hospital;

A mental health facility licensed under title 33; and

A long-term care facility.

No more than three (3) members shall be engaged in an academic position at the time of their appointment to the board.

In making appointments to the board, the governor should consider the importance of geographical diversity to this board.

Members of the board may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested nursing groups, including, but not limited to, their respective organizations. Each list may contain a minimum of three (3) times as many names as the number of appointments to be made. Lists of persons shall be submitted at least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of the term of office of any members of the board. The appointment provisions of this subdivision (e)(1) shall not apply to the public member serving on the board.

In making appointments to the board in accordance with subdivision (e)(1), the governor shall consult with interested nursing groups, including, but not limited to, their respective organizations to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

Each licensee member appointed to serve on the board shall:

Be a resident of this state for at least one (1) year immediately preceding appointment;

Be currently licensed and in good standing with an unencumbered license;

Be currently engaged in the practice of nursing; and

Have no less than five (5) years of experience as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse.

The consumer member appointed to the board shall:

Be a resident of this state for at least one (1) year immediately preceding their appointment;

Not have a direct or indirect financial interest in healthcare services;

Not have been a healthcare provider or be enrolled in any health-related educational program; and

Not be a member or employee of any board of control of any public or private healthcare organization.

A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor in such a manner to ensure the requirements of this section are met.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Except as provided in subsection (k), members currently holding appointments on the board shall serve their full terms. As vacancies occur, new appointments shall be filled by the governor in accordance with this section.

No member shall serve more than eight (8) continuous years on the board. A member shall be eligible to be reappointed after not serving on the board for four (4) years. The term of any member of the board with eight (8) or more years of service on the board on April 25, 2012, shall terminate January 1, 2013.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 3; 1981, ch. 462, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-731; Acts 1984, ch. 755, § 4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 45; 2005, ch. 387, §§ 13, 14; 2012, ch. 814, § 3; 2016, ch. 980, §§ 16, 17.

Attorney General Opinions. Delegation of Governor’s appointing authority to private entities for purpose of submitting lists for appointments to state licensing boards or agencies. OAG 10-67, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (5/17/10).

63-7-203. Terms of members.

Members of the board shall serve for a term of four (4) years or until their successor shall be appointed. No member may serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. At least four (4) years shall lapse before a member may be reappointed to the board or may serve in any capacity associated with the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-732; Acts 2012, ch. 814, § 4.

63-7-204. Organization.

Promptly after the appointment of the board, it shall meet and organize by electing one (1) member to serve as chair and one (1) member to serve as vice chair.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-733.

Cross-References. Director of health-related licensing division as ex officio member, § 63-1-133.

63-7-205. Meetings — Quorum.

Six (6) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for a meeting.

No action of the board shall be valid unless authorized by the affirmative vote of a majority of members present.

The board shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year and such other meetings as the board may determine.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-734; Acts 1984, ch. 755, § 5; 2005, ch. 387, § 15.

63-7-206. Disposition of fees and moneys received — Operating expenses — Compensation.

All fees and moneys from whatever source coming into the hands of the board shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund for the proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure may be made by the board until allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. The allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

The members of the board shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day's service in attending meetings of the board and other administrative or disciplinary functions of the board and necessary expenses for traveling and subsistence while attending such meetings or performing such functions. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 7; 1976, ch. 501, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(114); T.C.A., § 63-735; modified; Acts 2005, ch. 80, § 1.

63-7-207. Powers and duties.

The board has the following powers and duties in addition to the powers and duties granted to or imposed upon it by other sections of this chapter:

Employ, with the approval of the governor, an executive director, who shall not be a member of the board. The executive director shall be entitled to have and receive a salary to be fixed by the board and approved by the commissioner of human resources and the commissioner of finance and administration;

Employ such other personnel as may be necessary for the effective and efficient discharge of the duties of the board;

Such executive director and other employees shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter;

Maintain an office in Nashville;

Adopt a seal that shall bear the words “Tennessee Board of Nursing” and the imprint thereof shall be placed upon all official papers of the board;

Adopt and from time to time revise such rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern its proceedings and to carry into effect the purpose of this chapter;

Make an annual report to the governor the first week in July, together with a statement of the receipts and disbursements of the board and maintain such records as may be required by the applicable laws and regulations of the state;

Cause the prosecution of persons violating this chapter;

Prescribe the minimum curricular and minimum standards for schools of nursing and for courses of training preparing persons for licensure under this chapter and provide for surveys of such schools or an affiliation of schools and courses;

Approve such schools and courses as meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board;

Conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications and fitness of applicants and issue licenses to applicants who successfully pass the examination for the practice of professional nursing or practical nursing;

Conduct hearings upon charges of suspension or revocation of a license or approval of a school of nursing or course of training and deny, suspend or revoke for proper cause licenses or approval of schools or course of training as provided in this chapter. Any action of or ruling or order made or entered by the board shall be subject to review by the courts of this state in the same manner and subject to the same powers and conditions as now provided by law in regard to the rulings, orders and findings of other quasi-judicial bodies in Tennessee, where not otherwise specifically provided;

Promote nursing education and nursing service through the state through surveys, institutes, conferences or such other means as may result in improved nursing education and nursing services in the state;

Determine the state, national and other meetings to be attended by the employees or individual members of the board in the interest of the advancement of nursing in this state;

Annually publish a directory listing all persons licensed to practice as a professional or practical nurse in Tennessee. The board shall have the authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the distribution of such directories. Such regulations may establish a reasonable price, not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per directory, to be charged for the directories. The directories shall be available free of charge to nonprofit health agencies operating in the state of Tennessee, federal and state governmental agencies, local health departments and individual licensees;

Establish and examine the qualifications, competencies, training, education and experience required of a registered nurse applying for a certificate of fitness as a nurse practitioner, as defined by the board, sufficient to prepare such person to write and sign prescriptions and/or issue drugs in accordance with the limitations and provisions of § 63-1-132;

Issue advisory private letter rulings to any affected licensee who makes such a request regarding any matters within the board's primary jurisdiction. Such private letter ruling shall only affect the licensee making such inquiry and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case to come before the board. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the board chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223;

By January 1, 2002, the board of nursing shall implement a plan to assure continuing competence of licensees, using educationally sound methods to promote learning and assess outcomes pertinent to contemporary standards of nursing practice;

Compile and disseminate demographic data collected on all licensees; and

Enter into grants, agreements, scholarships or other arrangements with statewide nonprofit agencies or other state agencies for the purpose of evaluating and guiding the development of the education, distribution, and availability of the nursing workforce to provide a basis for improving the delivery of quality health care.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 8; 1976, ch. 501, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(114); 1980, ch. 851, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-736; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 10; 1998, ch. 1047, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 439, § 3; 2001, ch. 314, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified nurse practitioners' prescription and drug authorization powers, § 63-7-123.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to set standards for public school nurses, OAG 98-073, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (3/31/98).

63-7-208. Qualifications of executive director.

The executive director shall serve as consultant on nursing education and nursing service and shall have the following minimum qualifications:

Master's degree in nursing from a recognized college or university;

License to practice nursing in this state; and

At least five (5) years' experience in any combination of administration, teaching or supervision in schools of nursing or public health nursing agencies.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-737; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 1.

Cross-References. Executive directorship authorized, § 63-7-207.

63-7-209. Duties of executive director.

The duties of the executive director of the board shall be such as are prescribed by the board and shall include the following:

Within thirty (30) days after the election of the officers of the board, the executive director shall certify to the governor the names of the officers so elected. A vacancy in any office or in the board membership shall likewise be certified by the executive director to the governor;

Keep a record of the minutes of the meetings of the board, a record of all persons applying for licenses under this chapter and of the actions of the board thereon and a register of all nurses who have complied with the requirements of the chapter. Such records shall at all reasonable times be open to public inspection;

Make a bond in such sum as required by the board, conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of the office. The premium of the bond shall be paid by the board;

Issue licenses to nurses complying with the requirements of this chapter and issue renewal certificates as provided in this chapter; and

From time to time, as may be determined by the board, render such reports and accountings as the board may order.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 10; T.C.A., § 63-738.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to set standards for public school nurses, OAG 98-073, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (3/31/98).

63-7-210. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A nurse licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of nursing may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 5.